Delaware, session 153, HB149.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 3365, Title 18 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 3365. School-based health centers. (a) For purposes of this section, a school-based health center (SBHC) is a health clinic that: (1) Is located in or near a school facility; (2) Is organized through school and health provider relationships; (3) Provides Except as provided by subsection (h) of this section, provides through licensed professionals primary health services to children, including comprehensive health assessments, diagnosis, and treatment of minor, acute, and chronic medical conditions, referrals to and follow-up for specialty care and oral and vision health services, mental health and substance use disorder assessments, crisis intervention, counseling, treatment, and referral to a continuum of mental health and substance abuse services including emergency psychiatric care, community support programs, inpatient care, and outpatient programs; and (4) Is recognized by the State pursuant to relevant regulations and law. (h) DPH shall have the authority to approve supervised clinical training rotations for mental health providers at SBHCs. Section 2. Amend Â§ 3571G, Title 18 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 3571G. School-based health centers. (a) For purposes of this section, a school-based health center (SBHC) is a health clinic that: (1) Is located in or near a school facility; (2) Is organized through school and health provider relationships; (3) Provides Except as provided by subsection (h) of this section, provides through licensed professionals primary health services to children, including comprehensive health assessments, diagnosis, and treatment of minor, acute, and chronic medical conditions, referrals to and follow-up for specialty care and oral and vision health services, mental health and substance use disorder assessments, crisis intervention, counseling, treatment, and referral to a continuum of mental health and substance abuse services including emergency psychiatric care, community support programs, inpatient care, and outpatient programs; and (4) Is recognized by the State pursuant to relevant regulations and law. (h) DPH shall have the authority to approve supervised clinical training rotations for mental health providers at SBHCs.